Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4109
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 15.
July 1, 2027